test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-kaavpug_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - kaavpug: #
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Nom: kaavpug
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Gen: kaavpug
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Acc: kaavpug
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Ill: [kaavpugân, ka'vpugân]
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Loc: [kavpugist, kaˊvpugist]
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Com: [kavpugáin, kaˊvpugáin]
    kaavpug+N+Sg+Abe: kaavpugttáá
    kaavpug+N+Ess: kaˊvpugin
    kaavpug+N+Par: kaˊvpugid
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Nom: [kavpugeh, kaˊvpugeh]
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Gen: [kavpugij, kaˊvpugij]
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Acc: [kavpugijd, kaˊvpugijd]
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Ill: [kavpugáid, kaˊvpugáid]
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Loc: [kavpugijn, kaˊvpugijn]
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Com: kaˊvpugijguin
    kaavpug+N+Pl+Abe: kaˊvpugijttáá
